Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-523
Auditorium; bonds; issuance; amount; election required; vote.

The city council may issue bonds not to exceed in amount two hundred and twenty-five thousand dollars for the construction, remodeling or completion of a municipal auditorium. But no such bonds shall be issued until authorized by the electors thereof by a majority of those voting thereon.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 18 1/2, p. 477;

C.S.1922, § 3644;

C.S.1929, § 14-521;

R.S.1943, § 14-523.